Illinois, session 104th, HB4604.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Hispanic-Serving Institutions Task Force Act. 6    Section 5. Legislative findings and purpose.7    (a) The General Assembly finds that:8        (1) Hispanic and Latino students represent a growing 9    share of this State's college-going population and are 10    critical to the State's workforce, economic vitality, and 11    civic life;12        (2) Hispanic-serving institutions play a central role 13    in expanding access to higher education, improving degree 14    completion, and advancing economic mobility for 15    first-generation and low-income students;16        (3) higher education institutions that meet the 17    federal definition of a Hispanic-serving institution or 18    that are an emerging Hispanic-serving institution benefit 19    from coordinated State policy alignment, technical 20    assistance, and resource leveraging; and21        (4) establishing a statewide advisory task force 22    allows the State to assess needs, identify best practices, 23    and develop actionable recommendations to support   HB4604- 2 -LRB104 17761 LNS 31193 b1    Hispanic-serving institutions.2    (b) The purpose of this Act is to establish the 3Hispanic-Serving Institutions Task Force to study, assess, and 4make recommendations regarding State support for 5Hispanic-serving institutions. 6    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Emerging Hispanic-serving institution" means an 8institution of higher education located in this State with an 9undergraduate, full-time-equivalent enrollment of at least 15% 10Hispanic or Latino students.11    "Hispanic-serving institution" means an institution of 12higher education located in this State that meets the federal 13definition of a Hispanic-serving institution under Title V of 14the federal Higher Education Act of 1965.15    "Task Force" means the Hispanic-Serving Institutions Task 16Force created under this Act. 17    Section 15. Hispanic-Serving Institutions Task Force.18    (a) The Hispanic-Serving Institutions Task Force is 19created. The Task Force shall be advisory in nature.20    (b) The Board of Higher Education and the Illinois 21Community College Board shall jointly provide administrative, 22technical, and staffing support to the Task Force, subject to 23available appropriations.   HB4604- 3 -LRB104 17761 LNS 31193 b1    Section 20. Membership.2    (a) The Task Force shall consist of all of the following 3members:4        (1) The Executive Director of the Board of Higher 5    Education or the Executive Director's designee, who shall 6    be co-chairperson of the Task Force.7        (2) The Executive Director of the Illinois Community 8    College Board or the Executive Director's designee, who 9    shall be co-chairperson of the Task Force.10        (3) One representative of the Illinois Student 11    Assistance Commission, appointed by the Executive Director 12    of the Illinois Student Assistance Commission.13        (4) One representative of the Department of Commerce 14    and Economic Opportunity, appointed by the Director of 15    Commerce and Economic Opportunity.16        (5) Two presidents or chancellors of public, 17    Hispanic-serving institutions or emerging 18    Hispanic-serving institutions located in this State, 19    appointed by the Governor.20        (6) Two presidents or chancellors of public community 21    colleges located in this State that are Hispanic-serving 22    institutions or emerging Hispanic-serving institutions, 23    appointed by the Governor.24        (7) One president or chancellor of a private, 25    nonprofit, Hispanic-serving institution or emerging 26    Hispanic-serving institution located in this State,   HB4604- 4 -LRB104 17761 LNS 31193 b1    appointed by the Governor.2        (8) Two faculty members from Hispanic-serving 3    institutions or emerging Hispanic-serving institutions 4    with expertise in student success, institutional capacity, 5    or workforce alignment, appointed by the Governor.6        (9) Two students enrolled at Hispanic-serving 7    institutions or emerging Hispanic-serving institutions 8    located in this State, appointed by the Governor.9        (10) One representative of a statewide, 10    Latino-serving, nonprofit organization with experience in 11    higher education policy, appointed by the Governor.12        (11) One representative of the business or workforce 13    development community with experience partnering with a 14    Hispanic-serving institutions, appointed by the Governor.15    (b) Appointments shall reflect geographic diversity and 16representation from both community colleges and universities.17    (c) Members of the Task Force shall serve without 18compensation but may be reimbursed for reasonable and 19necessary travel expenses from funds appropriated for that 20purpose, subject to the rules of the appropriate travel 21control board. 22    Section 25. Duties. The Task Force shall do all of the 23following:24        (1) Assess the current landscape of Hispanic-serving 25    institutions and emerging Hispanic-serving institutions in   HB4604- 5 -LRB104 17761 LNS 31193 b1    this State, including enrollment trends, degree 2    completion, transfer outcomes, workforce alignment, and 3    institutional capacity.4        (2) Identify barriers to student access, retention, 5    and completion, including funding equity, data capacity, 6    faculty diversification, infrastructure needs, and the 7    basic needs of students.8        (3) Review existing State policies, funding formulas, 9    and accountability frameworks to determine their impact on 10    Hispanic-serving institutions and their students' success.11        (4) Examine best practices from other states related 12    to supporting Hispanic-serving institutions.13        (5) Develop recommendations to:14            (A) improve access to and success in higher 15        education for students;16            (B) strengthen institutional capacity, including 17        grant development and research infrastructure;18            (C) improve coordination between State agencies 19        and Hispanic-serving institutions;20            (D) align Hispanic-serving institutions' efforts 21        with State workforce and economic development 22        priorities; and23            (E) consider the feasibility of creating a 24        permanent State initiative, designation, or funding 25        mechanism to support Hispanic-serving institutions.   HB4604- 6 -LRB104 17761 LNS 31193 b1    Section 30. Meetings; quorum; hearings.2    (a) The Task Force shall meet at least quarterly at the 3call of the co-chairpersons.4    (b) A majority of the members of the Task Force shall 5constitute a quorum.6    (c) The Task Force may hold public hearings and solicit 7public testimony as necessary to carry out the Task Force's 8duties. 9    Section 35. Report.10    (a) No later than 18 months after the effective date of 11this Act, the Task Force shall submit a written report to the 12Governor and the General Assembly.13    (b) The report shall include the Task Force's findings and 14recommendations for legislative, administrative, or budgetary 15action.16    (c) The Board of Higher Education and the Illinois 17Community College Board shall each post the report on their 18respective public websites. 19    Section 90. Dissolution and repeal. The Task Force is 20dissolved upon submission of the report required under Section 2135, and this Act is repealed on January 1, 2029. 22    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 23becoming law.